Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 65.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
81-528
State Fire Marshal
Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The State
Fire Marshal Cash Fund is created. Money collected pursuant to subsections
(2) and (3) of this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the fund. The fund shall be used to pay for costs incurred in the general
operations program of the State Fire Marshal's office, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The State Fire Marshal Cash Fund shall be administered
by the State Fire Marshal. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) All money received from inspection contracts, penalties,
fees, or forfeitures, except fines collected under sections 81-501.01 to 81-531
and 81-5,151 to 81-5,157, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the fund.

(3) All fees assessed pursuant to section 81-505.01 for services
performed by the State Fire Marshal's office shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the fund.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 27, p. 489;

C.S.1929, § 81-5527;

R.S.1943, § 81-528;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 97, p. 2407;

Laws 1973, LB 120, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 498, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 83;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 99;

Laws 2004, LB 1091, § 15;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 65.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.